Utah statutes.
77-32-305.5.   Reimbursement of extraordinary expense.

(1)  For the purposes of this section, an "extraordinary expense" means the collective expense which exceeds $500 for defense resources or any particular service or item such as experts, investigators, surveys, or demonstrative evidence.

(2)  The county or municipality shall reimburse expenses, exclusive of overhead and extraordinary expense not approved by the court in accordance with this chapter, reasonably incurred by assigned attorneys for indigent defendants through a contracted defense services provider or if so ordered by the court based on a hearing held in accordance with Subsections 77-32-303(2) and (3), or for an appointed counsel under Section 77-32-304.5.

(3)  The assigned attorney shall file a motion with the court for approval of the proposed expenditure for any extraordinary expense before the expense is incurred.  The motion shall be heard and ruled upon by a judge other than the trial judge if so requested by either party or upon the motion of the trial judge.

